Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 5
P

UBLIC WATER SYSTEMS

Cross references.

- Supplementary powers of local governments, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. III.

Power of municipal corporations to acquire and construct water and sewage systems,

§

36-34-5

.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Rules for safe drinking water, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-5.

Water quality control, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-6.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Hazardous Waste Issues in Real Estate Transactions," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 581 (1987).

12-5-170. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Safe Drinking Water Act of 1977."

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 2.)

12-5-171. Declaration of policy; legislative intent; Environmental Protection Division to administer part.

As a guide to the interpretation and application of this part, it is declared to be the policy of the State of Georgia that the drinking waters of the state shall be utilized prudently to the maximum benefit of the people and that the quality of such waters shall be considered a major factor in the health and welfare of all people in the State of Georgia. To achieve this end, the government of the state shall assume responsibility for the quality of such waters and the establishment and maintenance of a water-supply program adequate for present needs and designed to care for the future needs of the state.

This requires that an agency of the state be charged with this duty and that it have the authority to require the use of reasonable methods, that is, those methods which are economically and technologically feasible, to ensure adequate water of the highest quality for water-supply systems. Because of substantial and scientifically significant variations in the characteristics, usage, and effect upon public interest of the various surface and underground waters of the state, uniform requirements will not necessarily apply to all waters or segments thereof. It is the intent of this part to confer discretionary administrative authority upon such agency to take the above and related circumstances into consideration in its decisions and actions in determining, under the conditions prevailing in specific cases, those procedures to best protect the public interests.

The Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources shall be the state agency to administer the provisions of this part consistent with the above-stated policy.

(Code 1933, § 88-2601, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 1.)

12-5-172. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Administrator" means the administrator of the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.

"Contaminant" means any physical, chemical, biological, or radiological substance or matter in water.

"Cross-connection" means any physical arrangement whereby a public water supply is or may be connected directly or indirectly with a nonpotable water supply or unapproved water-supply system, sewer, drain, conduit, pool, storage reservoir, plumbing fixture, or other device which contains or may contain contaminated water, liquid, gases, sewerage, or other waste of unknown or unsafe quality, which may be capable of imparting contamination to the public water supply as the results of backflow, bypass arrangements, jumper connections, removable sections, swivel or changeover devices, and other temporary, permanent, or potential connections through which or because of which backflow or backsiphonage could or would occur.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division, or his designee.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Federal act" means the Safe Drinking Water Act, P.L. 93-523.

"Georgia primary drinking water regulation" means a regulation which:

Applies to public water systems;

Specifies contaminants which, in the judgment of the director, may have any adverse effect on the health of persons;

Specifies for each contaminant either a maximum contaminant level in public water systems if, in the judgment of the director, it is economically and technologically feasible to ascertain the level of such contaminant in such systems, or if, in the judgment of the director, it is not economically or technologically feasible to ascertain the level of such contaminant, each treatment technique known to the director which leads to a reduction in the level of such contaminant sufficient to satisfy the requirements of 42 U.S.C. Section 300g-1;

Contains criteria and procedures to assure a supply of drinking water which dependably complies with such maximum contaminant levels, including quality control and testing procedures to ensure compliance with such levels and to ensure proper operation and maintenance of the system, and requirements as to the minimum quality of water which may be taken into the system and siting for new facilities for public water systems.

"Municipality" means a city, town, or other public body created by or pursuant to state law.

"National primary drinking water regulations" means primary drinking water regulations promulgated by the administrator pursuant to the federal act.

"Person" or "persons" means any individual, corporation, company, association, partnership, county, municipality, state agency, or other entity.

"Public water system" means a system for the provision to the public of piped water for human consumption, if such system has at least 15 service connections or regularly serves at least 25 individuals. Such term includes but is not limited to any collection, treatment, storage, and distribution facilities under the control of the operator of such system and used primarily in connection with such system, and any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under such control which are used primarily in connection with such system.

"Secondary drinking water regulation" means a regulation which applies to public water systems and which specifies the maximum contaminant levels which, in the judgment of the director or administrator, are requisite to protect the public welfare. Such regulations may apply to any contaminant in drinking water which may adversely affect the odor or appearance of such water and consequently may cause a substantial number of the persons served by the public water system providing such water to discontinue its use, or which may otherwise adversely affect the public welfare.

"Waters of the state" means and includes any and all rivers, streams, creeks, branches, lakes, reservoirs, ponds, drainage systems, springs, wells, and all other bodies of surface or underground water, natural or artificial, of this state.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12.)

U.S. Code.

- The Safe Drinking Water Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified principally as 42 U.S.C.

§

300f et seq.

12-5-173. Designation of division as state agency to receive financial aid from federal government and other sources.

The division shall be designated as the state agency to receive and administer financial aid from the federal government or other public or nonprofit sources for purposes of water-supply quality control, administration of the state's water-supply program, administration of any federal or state water-supply grant program, or any purposes relating to the furnishing of water by public water systems.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 23.)

12-5-174. Powers and duties of Board of Natural Resources as to public water systems.

In the performance of its duties, the Board of Natural Resources shall:

Establish by rule or regulation standards of quality for water that will be distributed in public water systems;

Establish by rule or regulation such policies, requirements, or standards governing the source, collection, distribution, purification, treatment, and storage of water for public water systems as it deems necessary for the reasonable and proper use thereof in conformity with the intent of this part;

Adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate such rules and regulations, including but not limited to the Georgia primary drinking water regulations, as are necessary for the proper administration of this part, which rules and regulations shall be applicable throughout the state and shall govern the installation, use, and operation of systems; cross-connection control; quality control; laboratory certification; and methods and means for treating and furnishing water to the public by way of public water systems;

Adopt, modify, repeal, and promulgate Georgia secondary drinking water regulations at such time as, in the judgment of the director or the administrator, they are necessary to protect the public welfare.

The powers and duties enumerated in subsection (a) of this Code section may be exercised and performed by the Board of Natural Resources through such duly authorized agents and employees as it deems fit and proper.

(Code 1933, § 88-2603, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1289, § 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 4.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Rules for safe drinking water, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-5.

12-5-175. Fluoridation of public water systems; state funds for cost of fluoridation equipment, chemicals, and materials; tax deduction for fluoride-removing devices.

The Board of Natural Resources shall have the power to require, by regulation, fluoridation of potable public water supplies in incorporated communities lying wholly within this state, provided that in no case should such fluoridation be required at a level greater than one part per million parts of water; provided, further, that any municipality or county and its water system can remove themselves from the terms of this part by referendum called by petition of 10 percent of the registered voters in such political subdivision who voted in the last general election. This applies to a referendum for or against fluoridation.

No incorporated municipality, county, or public or private water authority shall be required to comply with subsection (a) of this Code section unless the state has made available funds for the cost of the fluoridation equipment, the installation of such equipment, and the materials and chemicals required for six months of fluoridation of such potable public water supplies.

Any person who is deemed allergic to fluoridated water and who finds it necessary, upon the advice of a physician or upon approval by the Department of Public Health, to purchase a device to remove the fluoride from the water may treat the cost of the device as a tax-deductible medical expense.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 148, §§ 1, 1A, 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Drinking water fluoridation grant program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection,

§

391-3-21-03.

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

12-5-176. Powers and duties of director as to public water systems generally.

The director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this part and all rules and regulations and orders promulgated hereunder;

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, investigations, research, and demonstrations relating to the quality and purity of waters for public water systems of the state as he deems advisable and necessary;

To issue permits covering the operation of public water systems, stipulating in each permit the conditions under which such permit was issued, and to deny, revoke, modify, or amend permits for good cause. In the event of denial, modification, or revocation of a permit, the director shall serve written notice of such action on the permit holder and shall set forth in such notice the reason for such action;

To make investigations, laboratory analyses, and inspections to ensure compliance with this part, rules and regulations issued pursuant hereto, and any orders which the director may issue;

To advise, consult, cooperate, and contract with other agencies of the state and political subdivisions thereof and, with the approval of the Governor, to negotiate and enter into agreements with the governments of other states and the United States and their several agencies on water quality matters, insofar as such agreements relate to the operation of public water systems;

To conduct such public hearings as he deems necessary for the proper administration of this part;

To collect and disseminate information relating to the quality of the water being furnished by the public water systems of the state;

To issue orders as may be necessary to enforce compliance with this part and all rules and regulations promulgated hereunder;

To investigate any apparent violation of this part and to take any action authorized hereunder as he deems necessary to enforce this part;

To institute, in the name of the division, proceedings of mandamus or other proper legal proceedings to enforce this part;

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this part; and

At the discretion of the director, to give instruction and training to public water system operators and public water system laboratory analysts; to provide technical assistance for such instruction and training by others; to collect fees for such training and assistance in accordance with Code Section 45-12-92; to purchase the services of any person to render such instruction and training; and to make available to any such person suitable space and facilities for the rendering of such instruction and training. The director may collect from the participants in any such instructional or training program a pro rata share of any actual out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the division in producing such program including, without limitation, the rental of nonagency facilities and the payment of nonagency instructors.

The above and foregoing powers and duties may be exercised and performed by the director through such duly authorized agents and employees as he deems necessary and proper.

(Code 1933, § 88-2603, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1289, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 305, § 2.)

12-5-177. Enforcement of rules and regulations; minimum requirements for and applicability of Georgia primary drinking water regulations; records and reports.

The director shall enforce all rules and regulations promulgated and adopted pursuant to this part.

The Georgia primary drinking water regulations shall be no less stringent than the complete interim or revised national primary drinking water regulations adopted pursuant to the federal act.

The Georgia primary drinking water regulations shall apply to each public water system in the state, except that such regulations shall not apply to a public water system which:

Consists only of distribution and storage facilities and which does not have any collection and treatment facilities;

Obtains all of its water from, but is not owned or operated by, the owner or operator of a public water system to which such regulations apply;

Does not sell water to any persons; and

Is not a carrier which conveys passengers in intrastate commerce.

The director shall initiate procedures for the enforcement of the rules and regulations promulgated and adopted pursuant to this part, including, but not necessarily limited to, monitoring and inspection procedures.

The director shall keep such records and make such reports with respect to his activities under subsections (a) and (d) of this Code section as may be required by regulations established by the administrator pursuant to the federal act.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 6.)

12-5-178. Variances and exemptions.

The director may authorize variances or exemptions from the regulations promulgated pursuant to this part under such conditions and in such manner as he deems necessary and desirable; provided, however, that such variances or exemptions shall not be permitted under conditions which are less stringent than the conditions under which variances and exemptions may be granted under the federal act.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 8.)

12-5-179. Permits for operation of public water systems; performance bonds.

It shall be unlawful for any person to own or operate a public water system, except in such a manner as to conform and comply with all rules, regulations, orders, and permits established under this part and applicable to the waters involved.

Except as to those owners or operators of public water systems excepted from Georgia primary drinking water regulations under Code Section 12-5-177, any person who owns or operates a public water system or who desires to commence operation of a public water system shall obtain a permit from the director to operate same. Any person who desires to own or operate a public water system but who was not operating such a system as of July 1, 1977, must obtain such permit prior to the operation of same. The director, under the conditions he prescribes, may require the submission of such plans, specifications, and other information as he deems relevant in connection with the issuance of such permits. The director may issue a permit which authorizes the person to operate a public water system, upon condition that the owner or operator of such system meets or will meet, pursuant to any schedule of compliance included in such permit, all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, including, but not limited to, drinking water regulations established pursuant to this part.

The director is authorized to require as conditions in permits issued under subsection (b) of this Code section the compliance with maximum contaminant levels established pursuant to this part. Maximum contaminant levels shall be complied with in the shortest reasonable period of time consistent with this part and the federal act. The director is further authorized, in conformity with this part and the federal act, to set schedules of compliance and include such schedules within the terms and conditions of such permits and to prescribe terms and conditions for such permits to assure compliance with applicable maximum contaminant levels and drinking water criteria established pursuant to this part, including, but not limited to, requirements concerning recording, reporting, monitoring, entry, inspection, and laboratory analyses, to the extent permissible under this part, and such other requirements as are consistent with the purposes of this part.

Each permit issued under subsection (b) of this Code section shall have a fixed term not to exceed ten years. Upon expiration of such permit, a new permit may be issued by the director and upon condition that the continued operation of such public water system meets or will meet all applicable drinking water standards, maximum contaminant levels, and all other requirements established pursuant to this part. The director is authorized to include in permits issued under this subsection such terms and conditions as are authorized under this subsection and subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section.

The director may revoke, suspend, or modify any permit issued under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Code section for cause, including, but not limited to, the following:

Violation of any condition of the permit;

Obtaining a permit by misrepresentation, or failure to disclose fully all relevant facts;

Change in any condition that requires either a temporary or permanent decrease in the maximum contaminant levels or elimination of the permitted operation.

In the event of modification, suspension, or revocation of a permit, the director shall serve written notice of such action on the permit holder and shall set forth in such notice the reason for the action.

A performance bond or letter of credit may be required by the director to further assist in the assurance that a public water system serving year-round residents maintains compliance with the established contaminant levels and the provision of an adequate supply of water at or above the required minimum pressure. Such a performance bond or letter of credit shall be required of the owner or operator of any public water system serving year-round residents if:

After the first violation of contaminant or water supply standards or requirements, the owner or operator of the public water system fails to make the necessary corrections after receiving a notice from the director specifying:

The corrections which must be made; and

A reasonable period of time for the completion of necessary corrective action; or

After a second violation of contaminant or water supply standards or requirements, the director makes a determination, based on factors such as past performance, frequency and severity of violations, and timeliness of corrective action, that a performance bond or letter of credit is required.

Any owner or operator of a public water system serving year-round residents who is required to obtain a performance bond or letter of credit pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall file with the director the following:

A performance bond, payable to the director and issued by an insurance company authorized to issue such bonds in this state; or

An irrevocable letter of credit, issued in favor of and payable to the director, from a commercial bank or other financial institution approved by the director.

The bond or letter of credit required in paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be:

Conditioned upon faithful compliance with this part, the regulations promulgated pursuant to this part, and the conditions and terms of the permit issued for the operation of the public water system;

In such amount as determined by the director as necessary to ensure the continued lawful operation of the public water system for a period up to ten years in the event the owner or operator fails to do so; provided, however, the range shall be as follows:

Systems with 25 service connections or less - an amount not to exceed $30,000.00;

Systems with 26 to 50 service connections - an amount not to exceed $40,000.00; or

Systems with more than 50 service connections - an amount not to exceed $50,000.00;

Subject to termination or expiration only upon 120 days' written notice to the director; and

Conditioned upon coverage for any violation occurring during the term of the bond or letter of credit of which written notice has been given to the owner or operator prior to 120 days after said term even though the initial or final determination of the violation occurs after the term of the bond or letter of credit.

If an existing bond or letter of credit is to expire or terminate, the owner or operator of the public water system shall file a replacement bond or letter of credit meeting the requirements of this subsection at least 60 days prior to the termination or expiration of the existing bond or letter of credit.

Upon a determination by the director that an owner or operator has violated this part, the regulations promulgated under this part, or the terms or conditions of a permit, the director may, after written notice of the violation to the owner or operator:

Forfeit or draw that amount of such bond or letter of credit that the director determines necessary to correct the violations determined and continue the lawful operation of the public water system; and

Expend such amount for such purposes.

No action taken by the director pursuant to this subsection, including the forfeiture of a bond or the drawing of funds from a letter of credit, shall relieve the owner or operator of a public water system from compliance with all provisions of this part, including the requirement to maintain in full force and effect a bond or letter of credit meeting the requirements of this subsection.

Every permit issued under this part shall be conditioned upon compliance with this subsection.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to:

Any public water system of the state, an agency of the state, a county, a municipality, or of any other political subdivision or governmental entity;

Any water system owned by a church or other religious institution;

Any water system owned or provided by an employer and used primarily to serve employees; and

Any water system which is jointly owned by private individuals who are the users of the water supplied by the system.

Any privately owned public water supplier within this state supplying water to customers who, incidental to the purchase of such water, utilize a waste-water sewer system owned or operated by a county, municipality, or local authority to dispose of or discharge the water purchased shall furnish to such political subdivision the amount of water consumed by each individually metered customer account during each billing period.

Upon receiving notice from a county, municipality, or local authority described in paragraph (1) of this subsection that a customer has failed to timely pay any charges for the use of the waste-water sewer system, the private water supplier shall, within five business days of such notice, suspend water supply to that customer. The water supply to such customer shall remain suspended until such political subdivision notifies the water supplier to resume water service. The private water supplier shall be authorized to charge a reasonable fee to the customer for the cost of suspension or resumption of water service.

Nothing in this subsection shall abrogate the provisions of Code Section 36-60-17.

The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to submetered multifamily, multi-industrial, or multicommercial properties.

(Code 1933, § 88-2606, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 7; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1074, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 2012, p. 843, § 1/HB 1102.)

12-5-180. Duty of permit applicants and holders to supply information as required by director.

Any applicant for a permit whose application is pending final consideration shall upon request of the director provide such additional information as may be necessary to complete final disposition of the application.

Any permit holder shall on request of the director furnish such information as is reasonably necessary and pertinent to enable the director to discharge his duties under this part.

(Code 1933, § 88-2607, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 9.)

12-5-180.1. Allocating water and waste-water usage among tenants; charging tenants for usage; measuring water usage.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, the owner or operator of a building containing residential units may install equipment or use an economic allocation methodology to determine the quantity of water that is provided to the tenants and used in the common areas of such a building; and the owner of such a building may charge tenants separately for water and waste-water service based on usage as determined through the use of such equipment or allocation methodology.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, the owner or operator of a building containing residential units may charge tenants separately for water and waste-water service, provided that the total amount of the charges to the tenants of such a building shall not exceed the total charges paid by the owner or operator for water and waste-water service for such building plus a reasonable fee for establishing, servicing, and billing for water and waste-water service and provided, further, that the terms of the charges are disclosed to the tenants prior to any contractual agreement.

All new multiunit residential buildings permitted on or after July 1, 2012, shall be constructed in a manner which will permit the measurement by a county, municipal, or other public water system or by the owner or operator of water use by each unit. This subsection shall not apply to any building constructed or permitted prior to July 1, 2012, which is thereafter: (1) renovated; or (2) following a casualty or condemnation, renovated or rebuilt.

All new multiunit retail and light industrial buildings permitted or with a pending permit application on or after July 1, 2012, shall be constructed in a manner which will permit the measurement by the owner or operator of water use by each unit. This subsection shall not apply to any building constructed or permitted prior to July 1, 2012, which is thereafter: (1) renovated; or (2) following a casualty or condemnation, renovated or rebuilt. This subsection is not intended to apply to newly constructed multiunit office buildings or office components of mixed use developments. Multiunit office buildings and the office component of mixed use developments may seek reimbursement from office tenants for water and waste-water use through an economic allocation which approximates the water use of each tenant based on square footage. The retail component of a mixed use development shall be constructed in a manner which will permit the measurement by the owner or operator of water use by each retail unit.

A county, municipal, or other public water system, if applicable, or the owner or operator of a building which is subject to subsection (c) or (d) of this Code section shall seek reimbursement for water and waste-water usage by the units through an economic allocation methodology which is based on the measured quantity of water used by each unit.

The owner or operator of such a building which includes common areas for the benefit of the units may also seek reimbursement for common area water and waste-water use through an economic allocation which approximates the portion of the common area water and waste-water services allocable to each unit.

The total amount of charges to the units under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall not exceed the total charges paid by the owner or operator for water and waste-water service for the building, plus a reasonable fee for establishing, servicing, and billing water and waste-water consumption.

The director shall be empowered to issue a temporary waiver of this subsection upon a showing by an owner or operator of a building subject to this subsection that compliance with this subsection has temporarily become impracticable due to circumstances beyond the control of the owner or operator. Such waiver shall be limited in duration to the period during which such circumstances remain in effect and beyond the control of the owner or operator to change.

The owner or operator who seeks reimbursement for water and waste-water usage as required by this chapter shall be relieved of liability for actions or inactions that occur as a result of billing or meter-reading errors by an unaffiliated third-party billing or meter-reading company.

A county, municipal, or other public water system shall be prohibited from charging any fee or levy for the installation or use of privately owned meters or other devices which measure or assist in the measurement of water use under subsection (c) of this Code section; provided, however, that a county, municipal, or other public water system shall be permitted to charge a fee or levy for the installation or use of publicly owned meters or other devices which measure or assist in the measurement of water use.

Subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this Code section shall not apply to any construction of a building the permit for which was granted prior to July 1, 2012.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-180.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1341, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1272, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 732, § 7/SB 370; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 12/HB 142.)

Cross references.

- Landlord and tenant, T. 44, C. 7.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2011, ", municipal or other" was deleted following "provided, however, that a county, municipal, or other" in subsection (f).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2000, p. 1341,

§

2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that that Act is applicable with respect to agreements entered into on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 732,

§

1/SB 370, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "The General Assembly recognizes the imminent need to create a culture of water conservation in the State of Georgia. The General Assembly also recognizes the imminent need to plan for water supply enhancement during future extreme drought conditions and other water emergencies. In order to achieve these goals, the General Assembly directs the Georgia Department of Natural Resources to coordinate with its Environmental Protection Division, the Georgia Environmental Facilities Authority [now known as the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority], the Georgia Department of Community Affairs, the Georgia Forestry Commission, the Georgia Department of Community Health, including its Division of Public Health, the Georgia Department of Agriculture, and the Georgia Soil and Water Conservation Commission to work together as appropriate to develop programs for water conservation and water supply."

Law reviews.

-
For article on 2010 amendment of this Code section, see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 185 (2010).

12-5-180.2. Fire sprinkler protection systems; limitation on fee for water service.

The purpose of this Code section is to encourage the use of fire sprinkler protection systems.

No county, municipal, or other public water system shall charge or assess a separate fee for water service for fire sprinkler protection systems for more than the costs to provide such service.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-180.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 353, § 1/SB 404.)

12-5-181. Inspections and investigations by division.

The director or any agents or employees of the division shall be permitted access in or upon any private or public property at all reasonable times for the purpose of inspecting and investigating conditions, processes, methods of treatment, and records relating to the operation of any public water system, or in order to test any feature of a public water system, including its raw water source.

(Code 1933, § 88-2608, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 10.)

12-5-182. Powers of director as to protection of public from contaminants presenting imminent and substantial danger.

The director, upon receipt of information that a contaminant is present in or is likely to enter a public water system and that such contaminant may present imminent and substantial danger to the public health, may take such authorized action as he may deem necessary in order to protect the public health. The actions which the director may take include, but shall not be limited to, issuing such orders as may be necessary to protect the health of persons who are or may be users of such system, including travelers; commencing actions under Code Section 12-5-187; and commencing a civil action for appropriate relief, including, but not limited to, an action to obtain a restraining order or temporary or permanent injunction.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 11.)

12-5-183. Plan for emergency provision of water.

The director shall develop an adequate plan for the provision of safe drinking water under emergency circumstances. When, in the judgment of the director, emergency circumstances exist in the state with respect to a need for safe drinking water, he may take such actions as he may deem necessary in order to provide such water where it otherwise would not be available.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 12.)

12-5-184. Notice of violations, variances, and exemptions involving public water systems.

Whenever a public water system:

Is not in compliance with the Georgia primary drinking water regulations, including, but not limited to, failure to comply with a maximum contaminant level;

Fails to perform monitoring required by regulations adopted pursuant to this part;

Is subject to a variance granted for an inability to meet a maximum contaminant level requirement;

Is subject to an exemption from a maximum contaminant level; or

Fails to comply with the requirements prescribed by a variance or exemption,

the owner or operator of such system shall as soon as practicable notify the local public health department, the director, and communications media serving the area served by the system, of the nature, extent, and possible adverse health effects of such situation. Such notice shall also be given by the owner or operator of such system in a form and manner and to the extent reasonably prescribed by the director, which shall, at a minimum, include publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the area served by such water system at least once every three months so long as the violation, variance, exemption, or other such situation continues. Such notice shall also be included with the water bills of the system so long as such situation continues, as follows: If the water bills of a public water system are issued more often than once every three months, such notice shall be included in at least one water bill of the system for each customer every three months; if the system issues its water bills less often than once every three months, such notice shall be included in each of the water bills issued by the system for each customer; provided, however, that the director may prescribe in regulations alternative notice requirements.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 13.)

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Rules for safe drinking water, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-5.

12-5-185. Order by director after failure of conference, conciliation, or persuasion; hearing on order or permit issued by director.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part has occurred, he shall attempt to obtain compliance therewith by conference, conciliation, or persuasion, if the making of such an attempt is appropriate under the circumstances. If he fails to obtain compliance in this manner, the director may order the violator to take whatever corrective action the director deems necessary in order to obtain such compliance within a period of time to be prescribed in such order.

Any order issued by the director under this part shall be signed by the director.

Any order or permit issued by the director shall become final unless the person or persons named therein files with the director a written request for a hearing within 30 days after such order or permit is served on such person or persons.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 15.)

12-5-186. Hearings; judicial review.

Hearings on contested matters and judicial review of final orders, permits, or other enforcement actions under this part shall be provided and conducted in accordance with subsection (c) of Code Section 12-2-2.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 351, § 16.)